South Dakota, session 2026, HB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-11:
No During the time a public officer holds office and for two years thereafter, no
person may publicly disseminate the employment, home, or school address or location of
a current or former that public officer, or the officer's immediate family or household
member:
(1) Without the consent of the public officer; and
(2) With the intent to:
(a) Harass, intimidate, or threaten the public officer or the officer's immediate
family or household member; or
(b) Otherwise cause the public officer or the officer's immediate family or
household member to reasonably fear for the officer's safety or the safety
of the officer's immediate family or household member.
A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 20-9:
In addition to the criminal penalty provided in section 1 of this Act, and any other
civil or criminal remedy available under law, there is a civil cause of action for the
dissemination of location information about a current or former public officer. The public
officer may recover punitive, special, and general damages, including damages for
emotional distress, and reasonable attorney fees and costs.
An action may be maintained under this section whether or not a person alleged
to have violated section 1 of this Act is charged or convicted of the alleged crime.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.